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DI192-15

Tc Terminal Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

By connecting terminals Tc and E1 of the check connector the airbag sensor assembly is set in the DTC
output mode. The DTCs are displayed by blinking the SRS warning light.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

If the DTC is not displayed, do the following troubleshooting.

1 Does SRS warning light light up for approx. 6 seconds?
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PREPARATION:

YES

Check operation of the SRS warning light after ignition switch

is turned from LOCK position to ACC or ON position.

(See page DI-447)

NO éfck SRS warninglight system.
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PREPARATION:
Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON.
CHECK:

Measurethe voltage betweenterminals Tcand E1 of check

connector.
OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

OK> Go to step 4.
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3 | Check voltage between terminal Tc of check connector and body ground.

ACC ON CHECK:

ﬂ T Measure the voltage between terminal Tc of check connector
or ¢ and body ground.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V
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connector and body ground.

OK(> bck harness betweenterminalE 1 ofcheck
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4 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@) Turnignition switchto LOCK.

(b) Disconnectnegative ( -)terminal cable fromthe battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.

(d) Insert service wire into terminal Tc from back side as
shown in the illustration.

(e) Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector with ser-
vice wire.

(f) Connectnegative ( -)terminal cabletothe battery.

(@)  Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

(h)  Connect service wire of terminal Tc to body ground.

CHECK:

Check operation of SRS warning light.

OK:
SRS waning light comes on.

NOTICE:

Pay due attention to the terminal connecting position to

avoid a malfunction.

sembly and check connector.

0K> Check harness between the airbag sensor as-

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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If the DTC is displayed without a DTC check procedure, perform the following

troubleshooting.

1 | Check resistance between terminal Tc of airbag sensor assembly and body
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ground.
LOCK Airbag Sensor Assembly PREPARATION:
(@) Turn ignition switch to LOCK.
® DQB (b) Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.
— R Te (c) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.

CHECK:
Check the resistance between terminal Tc of the airbag sensor
assembly connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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